pl: Umiejscowienie wylotu spalin: Tylny; Boczny; Górny; Wylot górny lub tylny; Pozostałe
nl: Positie van rookgasafvoer: Achterkant; Zijkant; Bovenkant; Boven- of achteruitblaasbaar; Overig
lt-LT: Dūmtraukio išvado padėtis: Gale; Šoninis; Viršus; Konvertuojamas iš viršaus arba iš galo; Kita
el: Θέση εξόδου καπναγωγού: Πίσω; Πλάι; Επάνω; Μετατρέψιμη άνω ή οπίσθια έξοδος; Άλλο
hr-HR: Položaj izlaza dimnjaka: Straga; Sa strane; Gornja strana; Promjenjivi gornji ili stražnji smjer; Ostalo
de: Position des Abzugrohrs: Hinten; Seite; Oberseite; Verdeck oder Heckverdeck; Sonstiges
it: Posizione di uscita della canna fumaria: Posteriore; Laterale; Parte superiore; Capote o tetto posteriore convertibile; Altro
bg-BG: Положение на изхода на димоотвода: Задно; Странично; Горно; С горно и задно конвертиране; Друго
pt-BR: Posição da saída da chaminé: Traseira; Lateral; Superior; Conversível superior ou traseiro; Outro
sl-SI: Položaj izhoda dimnika: Zadaj; Stranski vnos; Zgoraj; Zgornji ali zadnji kabriolet; Druga
hu: Füstcső kimenetének helye: Hátsó; Oldalsó; Felső; Felső vagy hátsó, átalakítható; Egyéb
fi: Savuhormiliitännän sijainti: Takaosa; Sivu; Yläpuoli; Päältä tai takaa, muunneltava; Muu
sk-SK: Poloha výstupu dymovodu: Zadný; Bočný; Vrch; Zhora alebo zozadu, podľa voľby; Iné
da: Røgrørs position: Bag; Side; Top; Konvertibel mellem foroven og forneden; Andet
ro-RO: Poziția evacuării de fum: Spate; Laterală; Sus; Convertibil superior sau posterior; Altele
zh-CN: 排烟口位置: 后侧; 侧面; 顶部; 顶部或后部可转换; 其他
ko: 연통 배출 위치: 뒤쪽; 사이드; 상단; 상단 또는 후면 전환 가능; 기타
ja: 煙道出口の位置: 後ろ; 横; 上; トップまたはリアコンバーチブル; その他
cs: Poloha vývodu kouřovodu: Zezadu; Z boku; Shora; Volitelný horní nebo zadní vývod; Jiné
th: ตำแหน่งช่องระบายควัน: ด้านหลัง; ทรงด้านข้าง; ด้านบน; ปรับตำแหน่งปล่องได้ด้านบนหรือด้านหลัง; อื่นๆ
tr: Baca çıkış konumu: Arkadan; Yan taraftan; Üst taraftan; Üstten veya arkadan açılır kapanır; Diğer
en: Flue outlet position: Rear; Side; Top; Top or rear convertible; Other
ru: Расположение выходного отверстия дымохода: Заднее; Боковое; Верхнее; Универсальный (верхний/задний выход); Другое
nb: Plassering av røykrør: Bak; Side; Topp; Topp- eller bakre kabriolet; Annet
zh-TW: 煙道出口位置: 後方; 側面; 上方; 可換到頂部或後部; 其他
fr: Position du conduit de fumée: Arrière; Côté; Haut; Sortie convertible haute ou arrière; Autre
vi: Vị trí cửa thoát khói: Sau; Bên; Trên; Có thể chuyển đổi mặt trên hoặc mặt sau; Khác
sv: Rökgasutloppets position: Bak; Sidomatning; Topp; Konvertibel topp- och bakåtåtkomst; Övrigt
pt-PT: Posição da saída da chaminé: Traseira; Lateral; Superior; Conversível topo ou traseira; Outro
es: Posición de la salida de humos: Trasero; Lateral; Superior; Convertible superior o trasero; Otros